apertium-bel.bel.dix
    <pardef n="ска/заць__vblex_perf_tv">
      <e><p><l>заць</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>заўшы</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>зан</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__сказан/ы"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ж</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ю"/></e>
      <e><p><l>жам</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жаце</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жуць</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>за</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>жы</l><r>заць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="р/абіць__vblex_impf_tv">
      <e><p><l>абіць</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>абіўшы</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>аблю</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>обіш</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>обіць</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>обім</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>обіце</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>обяць</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>а</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>і</l><r>абіць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="пі/саць__vblex_impf_tv">
      <e><p><l>саць</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>шучы</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сан</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__сказан/ы"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ш</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ю"/></e>
      <e><p><l>шам</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>шаце</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>шуць</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>са</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>шы</l><r>саць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="люб/iць__vblex_impf_tv">
        <e><p><l>іць</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l></l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__люб/лю"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__люб/ім"/></e>

        <e><p><l>і</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

        <e><p><l>і</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="вып/іць__vblex_perf_tv">
        <e><p><l>іць</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>'</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ю"/></e>
        <e><p><l>'</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ем"/></e>

        <e><p><l>і</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

        <e><p><l>і</l><r>іць<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гуля/ць__vblex_impf_iv">
        <e><p><l>ць</l><r>ць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

        <e><p><l>ючы</l><r>ць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>ць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ю"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>ць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ем"/></e>

        <e><p><l></l><r>ць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

        <e><p><l>й</l><r>ць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="м/агчы__vbmod_impf"> <!-- TODO: Fix -->
      <e><p><l>агчы</l><r>агчы<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>агу</l><r>агчы<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>аглі</l><r>агчы<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ожа</l><r>агчы<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="закры/ваць__vblex_impf_tv">
      <e><p><l>ваць</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ючы</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ю"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/ем"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ва</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>вай</l><r>ваць<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гляд/зець__vblex_impf_tv">
      <e><p><l>зець</l><r>зець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>зець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__гляд/жу"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>зець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__гляд/зім"/></e>

      <e><p><l>зе</l><r>зець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>і</l><r>зець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="с/ядзець__vblex_impf_iv">
      <e><p><l>ядзець</l><r>ядзець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>яд</l><r>ядзець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__гляд/жу"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ядзім</l><r>ядзець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>едзіце</l><r>ядзець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ядзяць</l><r>ядзець<s n="vbmod"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ядзе</l><r>ядзець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__бы/ў"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ядзі</l><r>ядзець<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="BASE__чака/й"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="сказаць"><i>ска</i><par n="ска/заць__vblex_perf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="пісаць"><i>пі</i><par n="пі/саць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="любіць"><i>люб</i><par n="люб/iць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="гуляць"><i>гуля</i><par n="гуля/ць__vblex_impf_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="магчы"><i>м</i><par n="м/агчы__vbmod_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="закрываць"><i>закры</i><par n="закры/ваць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="глядзець"><i>гляд</i><par n="гляд/зець__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="адказаць"><i>адка</i><par n="ска/заць__vblex_perf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="адказваць"><i>адказ</i><par n="закры/ваць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="рабіць"><i>р</i><par n="р/абіць__vblex_impf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="выпіць"><i>вып</i><par n="вып/іць__vblex_perf_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="сядзець"><i>с</i><par n="с/ядзець__vblex_impf_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="заглядваць"><i>заглядва</i><par n="гуля/ць__vblex_impf_iv"/></e>
